Connecticut, session 2026, HB05578.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Special act 22-18 is amended to read as follows (Effective
from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Commissioner of Administrative Services, on behalf of the
Commissioner of Correction, shall convey to the Chesprocott Health
District a parcel of land located in the town of Cheshire, at a cost equal
to the administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcel of
land has an area of approximately 2 acres and is identified as a portion
of the approximately 166.95 acre parcel containing the Cheshire
Correctional Institute, a portion of Block 57 on Town of Cheshire Tax
Assessor's Map 36, and adjoining the parcel conveyed pursuant to
section 2 of special act 14-23. The conveyance shall be subject to the
approval of the State Properties Review Board.
(b) The Chesprocott Health District shall use said parcel of land for
purposes of building a regional health district, including to house
Division of Emergency Management and Homeland Security Region
No. 2 and emergency support function No. 8, public health and medical

Substitute House Bill No. 5578
services, except the health district may (1) permit a nonprofit
organization to use said parcel of land, or a portion of said parcel, for
the provision of temporary housing, or (2) convey said parcel, or a
portion of said parcel, to a nonprofit organization for the provision of
temporary housing, provided any such housing meets any applicable
local zoning requirements. If the health district:
[(1)] (A) Does not use said parcel for any of said purposes;
[(2)] (B) Does not retain ownership of all of said parcel, other than a
conveyance to a nonprofit organization for temporary housing
purposes; or
[(3)] (C) Leases all or any portion of said parcel, other than a lease to
a nonprofit organization for temporary housing purposes, the parcel
shall revert to the state of Connecticut. Any sale of said parcel to a
nonprofit organization in accordance with the provisions of this section
shall be for the fair market value of the property, as determined by the
average of the appraisals of two independent appraisers selected by the
Commissioner of Administrative Services. Any funds received by the
health district from a sale or lease for temporary housing purposes in
accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall be transferred to
the State Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of [Correction]
Administrative Services. The land shall remain under the care and
control of [said department] the Department of Correction until a
conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this section.
The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or instrument
necessary for a conveyance under this section, which deed or instrument
shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of subsection (b) of
this section. The Commissioner of [Correction] Administrative Services
Special Act No. 26-19 2 of 3

Substitute House Bill No. 5578
shall have the sole responsibility for all other incidents of such
conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-19 3 of 3